dictionaries/be_BY/be-official.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3001 Y 1
SFX 3001 і оўвала і
SFX 4035 Y 1
SFX 4035 й сцях й
SFX 3855 Y 1
SFX 3855 ў чалі ў
SFX 4757 Y 1
SFX 4757 е оваму е
SFX 3850 Y 1
SFX 3850 т чана т
SFX 4912 Y 1
SFX 4912 у чана у
SFX 4335 Y 1
SFX 4335 а ца а
SFX 3104 Y 1
SFX 3104 а ніку а
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 й чнае й
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 й чнай й
SFX 3958 Y 1
SFX 3958 у энняў у
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 і ляўся і
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 к чнай к
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 к чнае к
SFX 718 Y 1
SFX 718 а ік а
SFX 2909 Y 1
SFX 2909 м чнае м
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 м чнай м
SFX 4331 Y 1
SFX 4331 т ціўшы т
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 е каму е
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 е ца е
SFX 4835 Y 1
SFX 4835 а енні а
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 т цім т
SFX 855 Y 1
SFX 855 у ым у
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 е ік е
SFX 1117 Y 1
SFX 1117 к чкі к
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 і ляюся і
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 й тых й
SFX 4558 Y 1
SFX 4558 к тых к
SFX 3067 Y 1
SFX 3067 ы энняў ы
SFX 4695 Y 1
SFX 4695 т чваю т
SFX 3861 Y 1
SFX 3861 м тых м
SFX 3455 Y 1
SFX 3455 й льніцкія й
SFX 2542 Y 1
SFX 2542 м стым м
SFX 1124 Y 1
SFX 1124 і яга і
